Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.68A.040 and 1989 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of sexual exploitation of a minor if the person:(a) Compels a minor by threat or force to engage in sexually explicit conduct, knowing that such conduct will be photographed or part of a live performance;(b) Aids, invites, employs, authorizes, or causes a minor to engage in sexually explicit conduct, knowing that such conduct will be photographed or part of a live performance; ((or))(c) Being a parent, legal guardian, or person having custody or control of a minor, permits the minor to engage in sexually explicit conduct, knowing that the conduct will be photographed or part of a live performance; or(d) Aids, invites, employs, authorizes, or causes a minor to view sexually explicit conduct, knowing that the minor's viewing of such conduct will be photographed or part of a live performance.(2) Sexual exploitation of a minor is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.--- END ---